apertium-oci.oci.metadix
        <pardef n="r/ire__vblex">  
      <e><p><l>iriam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iriái</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iriatz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iriás</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>irián</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iriá</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>irem</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>irai</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iretz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iràs</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iràn</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>irà</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isent</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>igam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>igam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>  
      <e><p><l>isètz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isètz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>  
      <e><p><l>itz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>itz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>  
      <e><p><l>ire</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>ire</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>  
      <e r="LR"><p><l>íser</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>  
      <e r="LR"><p><l>íser</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>  
      <e><p><l>isiam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isiái</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isiatz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isiáis</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isián</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isiá</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l>iguèrem</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguèri</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguèretz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguères</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguèron</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>iguèt</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguèssem</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguèsse</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iguèssi</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguèssetz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguèsses</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguèsson</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguèsse</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>igudas</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguda</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iguts</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>igut</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isèm</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isi</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>isètz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>ises</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>ison</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>itz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>igam</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iga</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>igatz</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>igas</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>igan</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>iga</l><r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <e r="LR" lm="rire" alt="oci@aran"><i>r</i><par n="r/ire__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="rire" alt="oci@gascon"><i>r</i><par n="r/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rire" alt="oci"><i>r</i><par n="r/ire__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="sorire" alt="oci@aran"><i>sor</i><par n="r/ire__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="sorire" alt="oci@gascon"><i>sor</i><par n="r/ire__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sorire" alt="oci"><i>sor</i><par n="r/ire__vblex"/></e>
